Hawaii statutes.
§186-5 Agreement with owner. Upon
classification, the board shall be responsible for preparing, executing, and
administering an agreement with the applicant and others having an interest in
or encumbrance upon the tree farm property. The agreement shall be for a
period of not less than twenty years but shall contain, inter alia, the
following conditions:

(1) The agreement shall be canceled and terminated
and the tree farm property shall thereby be declassified if, upon
investigation, the board determines that the owner of the property is not
complying with this chapter or the management plan;

(2) Any owner of tree farm property desiring to
withdraw all or part of the property from the operations of this chapter may at
any time make written application to the board;

(3) The owner shall develop and maintain trees of
commercial species and other forest products as specified in the management
plan.

The agreement shall also contain other terms and
conditions deemed advisable by the board. [L 1963, c 141, §6; Supp, §87D-6; HRS
§186-5; am L 1989, c 50, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next